District of Columbia statutes.
29A-611

Repealed

Annual statement; filing and recordation; contents.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1282, ch. 854, § 584
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(5), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-411.
1981 Ed., § 29-811.
2001 Ed., § 29-611.